Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 142A-15 of Title 21, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In any felony criminal proceeding in which a proposed plea
agreement is presented to a special judge or associate district
judge, the victim or representative of the victim, may request

Req. No. 15524 Page 1

revi ew of the proposed plea agreement prior to acceptance by the
court.
B. Upon the formation of a proposed plea agreement, the
district attorney shall, upon request, provide to the victim or
representative of the victim reasonable notice of the proposed
agreement and the date, time, and place at which the court shall
consider acceptance of the plea.
C. If the proposed plea agreement is presented to a special
judge or associate district judge and the victim or representative
of the victim requests a review of the proposed plea agreement
pursuant to subsection A of this section, the special judge or
associate district judge shall not accept or finalize the plea
agreement. The proposed plea agreement shall be submitted to the
district court judge of the judicial district for review and
determination.
D. The district court judge shall independently review the
proposed plea agreement and may accept or reject the agreement in
the exercise of judicial discretion. The review conducted pursuant
to this subsection shall constitute final judicial approval or
rejection of the plea agreement.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer party
status upon a victim, to impair the prosecutorial discretion of the
district attorney, or to create a right to appeal the merits of a
plea agreement. This section governs only the judicial authority
Req. No. 15524 Page 2

requ ired for acceptance of a proposed plea agreement upon request by
a victim. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or
impair any right of a victim to assert or enforce rights otherwise
provided by law.
F. Failure to request review of the proposed plea agreement
pursuant to this section shall not affect the validity of a plea
agreement otherwise accepted by the court.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15524 GRS 12/31/25














Req. No. 15524 Page 3